Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 13. Hathaway Scholarship Program
§ 21-16-1307.
Success curriculum; test standards.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 187, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided for by law, the success curriculum required to qualify for honor or performance scholarship eligibility under this article for students graduating from high school in the 2019-2020 school year and each school year thereafter shall be as follows:

Math – four (4) years of math to include those specified in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph. Courses which are the functional equivalent of the specified courses, including courses taken before grade nine (9), may be used to satisfy the level of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph:

Algebra I;

Algebra II;

Geometry; and

An additional math or computer science course taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). A computer science course shall not satisfy a requirement of this paragraph if the computer science course is used to satisfy one (1) year of science under paragraph (iii) of this subsection.

Language arts – four (4) years of language arts at the college or industry preparatory level in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), to include reading, writing, listening and speaking;

Science – four (4) years of science in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) to include at least three (3) years of those courses specified in subparagraphs (A) through (J) of this paragraph and a fourth year from any of those courses specified in subparagraphs (A) through (K) of this paragraph:

Physics I;

Physics II;

Chemistry I;

Chemistry II;

Biology I;

Biology II;

Geology I;

Computer science I;

Physical science;

An additional science course.

Social studies – three (3) years of social studies in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) to include a combination of the following subject matters:

World history;

American history;

Geography;

American government; and

Economic systems and institutions.

and (vi) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 2.

Elective pathway – four (4) years, including at least two (2) years of related courses taken in sequence, of any of the following:

Fine and performing arts – instruction in fine and performing arts, which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12);

Career and technical education — instruction in career and technical education, which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or

World language — instruction in world language, which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). Instruction in the native language of the Eastern Shoshone or the Northern Arapaho tribes, or instruction in American sign language may be taken in fulfillment of this subparagraph.

Notwithstanding the requirements in paragraphs (ii) through (iv) and (vii) of this subsection and as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection for courses to be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), courses taken before grade nine (9) that are the functional equivalent of courses specified in those paragraphs may be used to satisfy the requirements of those paragraphs of this subsection.

The success curriculum required to qualify for honor or performance scholarship eligibility under this article for students graduating from high school prior to the 2010-2011 school year shall be as follows:

For students graduating in the 2007-2008 school year:

Math – Algebra I;

Science – one (1) of the courses specified in subparagraphs (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this section.

For students graduating in the 2008-2009 school year:

Math:

Algebra I and either:

Geometry; or

Algebra II.

Science – two (2) of the courses specified in subparagraphs (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this section;

Social studies – a course covering the subject matter of American history.

For students graduating in the 2009-2010 school year:

Math:

Algebra I;

Geometry; and

Algebra II.

Science – three (3) of the courses specified in subparagraphs (b)(iii)(A) through (J) of this section;

Social studies – courses covering the subject matters of:

World history; and

American history.

Foreign language – one (1) year of foreign language which may include one (1) year of instruction in the native language of the Eastern Shoshone or the Northern Arapaho or one (1) year of instruction in American sign language, taken in grades nine (9) through (12).

The success curriculum required to qualify for opportunity scholarship eligibility under this article for students graduating from high school in the 2010-2011 school year and each school year thereafter shall be as follows:

Math – four (4) years of math to include those specified in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph. Courses which are the functional equivalent of the specified courses, including courses taken before grade nine (9), may be used to satisfy the level of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph:

Algebra I;

Algebra II;

Geometry; and

An additional math or computer science course taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). A computer science course shall not satisfy a requirement of this paragraph if the computer science course is used to satisfy one (1) year of science under paragraph (iii) of this subsection.

Language arts – four (4) years of language arts at the college or industry preparatory level in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), to include reading, writing, listening and speaking;

Science – four (4) years of science in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), three (3) of which shall satisfy high school graduation requirements under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii)(C);

Social studies – three (3) years of social studies in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) to include a combination of the following subject matters:

World history;

American history;

Geography;

American government; and

Economic systems and institutions.

Except as provided by subsection (vi) of this subsection, foreign language - demonstrate proficiency on the state standards for the foreign cultures and languages common core of knowledge requirement under W.S. 21-9-101(b)(i)(K) which may include American sign language as one (1) component of foreign language proficiency;

Effective school year 2015-2016 and each school year thereafter, and in lieu of paragraph (v) of this subsection, one (1) of the following:

World language — two (2) sequenced years of the same world language which need not be taken consecutively, at least one (1) of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in the Shoshone or Arapaho languages, or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in American sign language, either of which need not be taken consecutively but at least one (1) year of which is taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or

Fine and performing arts – two (2) years of instruction in fine and performing arts, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or

Career and technical education — two (2) years of instruction in career and technical education, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12).

Notwithstanding the requirements in paragraphs (ii) through (vi) of this subsection and as provided in paragraph (i) of this subsection for courses to be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), courses taken before grade nine (9) that are the functional equivalent of courses specified in those paragraphs may be used to satisfy the requirements of those paragraphs of this subsection.

The success curriculum required to qualify for provisional opportunity scholarship eligibility under this article for students graduating from high school in the 2010-2011 school year and each school year thereafter shall be the curriculum required for high school graduation under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii) subject to the following:

Two (2) of the three (3) years of mathematics required under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii)(B) shall consist of at least two (2) years of those courses specified in subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph:

Algebra I;

Algebra II;

Geometry.

Except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, demonstration of proficiency on the state standards for the foreign cultures and languages common core of knowledge requirement under W.S. 21-9-101(b)(i)(K) which may include American sign language as one (1) component of foreign language proficiency;

Effective school year 2015-2016 and each school year thereafter, and in lieu of paragraph (ii) of this subsection, instruction in one (1) of the following:

World language — two (2) sequenced years of the same world language which need not be taken consecutively, at least one (1) of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in the Shoshone or Arapaho languages, or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in American sign language, either of which need not be taken consecutively but at least one (1) year of which is taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or

Fine and performing arts – two (2) years of instruction in fine and performing arts, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or

Career-vocational education – two (2) years of instruction in career-vocational education, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12).

For purposes of paragraph (i) of this subsection and as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, courses taken before grade nine (9) that are the functional equivalent of courses specified in those paragraphs may be used to satisfy the requirements of those paragraphs of this subsection.

The courses set forth as success curricula requirements under this article shall be aligned with the student content and performance standards established pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii). The department shall by rule and regulation:

Provide for each school district to submit, and the department to verify, a list of courses provided in the district which satisfy the success curriculum requirements specified in this section. The rules shall include a process to authorize and verify functional equivalents of courses specified in this section, including but not limited to review of career technical education, arts and music and honor courses, college level courses offered to high school students and courses offered pursuant to W.S.

21-20-201

. The verification process shall be completed in sufficient time for students registering for the subsequent school year to be apprised of the courses which meet the success curriculum requirements;

Establish exceptions as necessary due to good cause to specific coursework within the success curriculum specified under this article for students attending or graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program. In addition, the department shall waive any requirement for success curriculum coursework for fine and performing arts or career and technical education for honor or performance scholarship eligibility, upon written certification by the superintendent of a district that these courses are not available in the district to the student. The department shall report any waiver granted under this section for the immediately preceding school year in its annual report, as required by W.S. 21-16-1308(d); and

Provide accommodations for a student with an individual education plan (IEP) or working under a federal 504 designation to meet the requirements of the success curriculum, including taking a modified course that is at grade level and is included within the scope of the student’s IEP or 504 designation.

In each odd-numbered year, the department, in consultation with the University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges and the community college commission, shall report to the governor and the joint education interim committee of the legislature on recommendations for modifications to the success curriculum requirements, minimum cumulative GPA and minimum national percentile rank scores or minimum cumulative career-technical aptitude assessment scores contained in this article and recommendations for the adoption of statewide student assessment standards and scores to augment qualifying national percentile rankings or career-technical aptitude assessment scores, all to ensure that the Hathaway scholarship program is designed to provide the desired incentives for students to pursue a rigorous curriculum and strive to achieve academic success. The report shall also include any additional resources which school districts, particularly those school districts granted exemptions for students under paragraph (f)(ii) of this section, may require to provide the success curriculum and impacts of the Hathaway success curriculum on school districts of different sizes. The cumulative GPA requirements for performance under the success curriculum shall not be restricted to those courses comprising the success curriculum, but shall be applied comprehensively to all courses included within each scholarship student’s high school curriculum.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 187, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 204, § 1; 2011, ch. 199, § 1; 2013 ch. 101, § 1, effective February 28, 2013; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 171, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2018 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 28, §§ 1, 2, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 102, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment

repealed former (a), which pertained to recommendations to the governor and the joint education interim committee regarding the contents and components of success curriculum and the adoption of statewide student standards and scores; added (b) through (f), and redesignated existing paragraphs accordingly; rewrote present (g), in part by substituting “curriculum” for “curricula” and inserted the next-to-last sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 187, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 97, § 1, effective March 12, 2008, inserted present (b)(iii)(J), redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly and made related changes.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective March 12, 2008, operative July 1, 2009, substituted “or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in American sign language, either of which need not be taken consecutively, but at least one (1) year” for “which need not be taken consecutively, at least one (1)” in (b)(v); added “or one (1) year of instruction in American sign language” in (c)(iii)(D); added “which may include American sign language as one (1) component of foreign language proficiency” in (d)(v) and (e)(ii).

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “provisional opportunity scholarship eligibility” for “career scholarship eligibility” in the introductory language of (e).

Laws 2009, ch. 204, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

The 2011 amendment,

inserted “and each school year thereafter” in the introductory language of (b), (d) and (e).

Laws 2011, ch. 199 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b)(vi); in (d)(v) added “Except as provided by subsection (vi) of this subsection;” added (d)(vi); in (e)(ii) added “Except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;” added (e)(iii); in (f)(ii) added the last two sentences.

The 2016 amendment

, in (g), substituted “In” for “Not later than October 1, 2007, October 1, 2008, October 1, 2009, and by October 1”, deleted “thereafter” following “odd-numbered year”, substituted “national percentile rank scores or minimum” for “composite ACT or” preceding “cumulative WORKKEYS scores”, and substituted “national percentile rankings” for “ACT” following “scores to augment qualifying.”

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2017 amendment

, in the middle of (b) substituted “2018-2019” for “2010-2011,” near the end of (b)(iii) added “courses” following “any of those”; in (f)(i) added “including but not limited to review of career technical education, arts and music and honor courses, college level courses offered to high school students and courses offered pursuant to
W.S.

21-20-201

” at the end of the second sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 171, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i)(D) and (d)(i)(D), inserted “or computer science” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 28, §
2, repealed former (b)(v) and (b)(vi), which read: "(v) Foreign language - two (2) sequenced years of the same foreign language which need not be taken consecutively, at least one (1) of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). Two (2) sequenced years of instruction in the native language of the Eastern Shoshone or the Northern Arapaho, or two (2) sequenced years of instruction in American sign language, either of which need not be taken consecutively but at least one (1) year of which is taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), may be taken in fulfillment of this paragraph; (vi) Effective school year 2015-2016 and each school year thereafter: (A) Fine and performing arts - two (2) years of instruction in fine and performing arts, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or (B) Career–vocational education - two (2) years of instruction in career-vocational education, all of which shall be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12); or (C) Foreign language - two (2) years of foreign language taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) which are in addition to the two (2) years required under paragraph (v) of this subsection, provided that at least two (2) of the total four (4) years, when combined with paragraph (v) of this subsection, shall be sequenced in the same foreign language pursuant to requirements of paragraph (v) of this subsection."

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (b)(viii), which read, "Notwithstanding the requirements in paragraph (vii) of this subsection for courses to be taken in grades nine (9) through twelve (12), courses taken before grade nine (9) that are the functional equivalent of courses specified in paragraph (vii) of this subsection may be used to satisfy not more than one (1) year of the requirements in paragraph (vii) of this subsection."; and added (d)(vii) and (e)(iv).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "career-vocational" and variants throughout the section.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “World” for “Foreign” preceding “language” and variants throughout the section; deleted “Indian” following “Arapaho” in (b)(vii)(C); in (d)(vi)(A), deleted “native language of the Eastern” preceding “Shoshone,” substituted “Arapaho languages” for “the Northern Arapahoe”; in (e)(iii)(A), deleted “native language of the Eastern” preceding “Shoshone,” substituted “Arapaho languages” for “the Northern Arapahoe.”

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b)(iii)(I) or (c)(ii)(A)(II) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Laws 2008, ch. 97, § 3, provides: “The department of education shall in consultation with school districts, establish content standards for the physical science course satisfying Hathaway success curriculum requirements as provided under section 2 of this act, which standards shall be of a rigor comparable to other science courses qualifying for the success curriculum as specified under W.S. 21-16-1307(b)(iii)(A) through (H).
On or before October 1, 2008, the department shall report to the joint education interim committee on the content standards established under this section and the effects of including physical science as one (1) of the required science courses under the Hathaway success curriculum.”

Laws 2008, ch. 97, § 4, provides:

“(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

“(b)
Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2009. Approved March 12, 2008.”

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 4, provides: “Amendments to W.S.

21-2-304

and

21-16-1307

contained in this act shall only apply to those students graduating high school on or after July 1, 2018.”

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 5, provides: “To the extent this act conflicts with 2018 House Bill 53, this act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any conflicting provision.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 205, § 1, states as follows:

“(a) For the period commencing on the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2010, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the state superintendent to continue the task force established pursuant to 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 95, Section 1001, for purposes of reviewing and evaluating the addition of sign language as fulfillment of foreign language requirements under the Hathaway student scholarship program prescribed by W.S.

21-16-1307

. The amount appropriated under this subsection shall be in addition to any other nongeneral funds or nonfoundation program account funds available for purposes of this section, which combined amount shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00). This combined amount shall be expended by the state superintendent through the department of education for:

“(i) Establishing cooperative partnerships with appropriate post secondary education institutions to develop course requirements for instructor certification in American sign language as a second language and to deliver courses in American sign language which may include distance education or concurrent enrollment;

“(ii) Developing an assessment instrument to determine proficiency standards for both highly qualified instructors and secondary education students;

“(iii) Determining necessary procedures for providing Hathaway student scholarship program access to transfer students with successful completion of American sign language coursework.

“(b) The state superintendent shall report final recommendations and proposed requirements for including American sign language as a foreign language component of the success curriculum to the joint education interim committee on or before October 1, 2009.”